Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2203
Department; duties; staff support.

The department
shall oversee and provide coordination for the state's participation in and
compliance with the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military
Children. The department shall provide staff support for the council created
in section 79-2204.

Laws 2011, LB575, § 3.